Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 4. Children in Need of Supervision Act

Cross references. —

For provisions of the Juvenile Justice Act, see article 2 of this chapter.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 5, as amended by Laws 1998, ch. 9, § 1, as amended by Laws 1999, ch. 72, § 1, as amended by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 16, § 1, had provided that this article would be repealed effective July 1, 2005. Laws 2005, ch. 58, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, repealed the repealer.

Program to reimburse guardians ad litem. —

Laws 2005, ch. 237, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, appropriates $2,100,000, or so much thereof as is necessary for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005, from the general fund to the Wyoming supreme court to establish and administer a program to reimburse attorneys providing legal representation as guardians ad litem in child protection cases under §§

14-3-101

through

14-3-440

, children in need of supervision cases under §§

14-6-401

through

14-6-440

, or termination of parental rights actions brought as a result of a child protection or children in need of supervision action. In order to execute this program, the act, in part, directs the district judges' judicial conference to recommend to the board of judicial policy and administration rules and regulations governing standards for the legal representation by attorneys as guardians ad litem in child protection or children in need of supervision cases and for the training of those attorneys. The act, in part, directs the board of judicial policy and administration to adopt rules and regulations governing standards for the legal representation by attorneys as guardians ad litem in child protection or children in need of supervision cases and for the training of those attorneys. The act, in part, directs the supreme court to enter into agreements with the individual counties of the state participating in the program to provide reimbursement for the legal representation of children by attorneys as guardians ad litem in child protection or children in need of supervision cases, and directs the supreme court to provide necessary administrative support for the reimbursement program. No state money appropriated under the act is to be expended in any county unless the county agrees to match, at a minimum, 25% of the state money for the reimbursement of legal representation of children by attorneys in child protection or children in need of supervision cases. In consultation with the board of judicial policy and administration, the supreme court and the individual county are to establish the reimbursement rate within the county for attorneys providing legal representation as guardians ad litem in child protection and children in need of supervision cases. The supreme court is to report each year on or before November 1 to the joint judiciary interim committee and the joint appropriations interim committee on the results of the program authorized by this section, including the number of cases and the amount of monies expended for reimbursements and the amounts of matching monies from participating counties.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

47 Am. Jur. 2d Juvenile Courts §§ 52 to 61.

43 C.J.S. Infants § 196.

§ 14-6-401.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Children In Need of Supervision Act.”

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-6-402.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Adjudication” means a finding by the court or the jury, incorporated in a decree, as to the truth of the facts alleged in the petition;

“Adult” means an individual who has attained the age of majority;

“Child” means an individual who is under the age of majority;

“Child in need of supervision” means any child who has not reached his eighteenth birthday who is habitually truant as defined in W.S. 21-4-101(a)(ii) or has run away from home or habitually disobeys reasonable and lawful demands of his parents, guardian, custodian or other proper authority or is ungovernable and beyond control. “Child in need of supervision” includes any child who has not reached his eighteenth birthday who has committed a status offense;

“Clerk” means the clerk of a district court acting as the clerk of a juvenile court;

“Commissioner” means a district court commissioner;

“Court” means the juvenile court established by W.S.

5-8-101

;

“Custodian” means a person, institution or agency responsible for the child’s welfare and having legal custody of a child by court order or having actual physical custody and control of a child and acting in loco parentis;

“Deprivation of custody” means transfer of legal custody by the court from a parent or previous legal custodian to another person, agency, organization or institution;

“Detention” means the temporary care of a child in physically restricting facilities pending court disposition or execution of a court order for placement or commitment;

“Judge” means the judge of the juvenile court;

“Legal custody” means a legal status created by court order which vests in a custodian the right to have physical custody of a minor, the right and duty to protect, train and discipline a minor, the duty to provide him with food, shelter, clothing, ordinary medical care, education and in an emergency, the right and duty to authorize surgery or other extraordinary medical care. The rights and duties of legal custody are subject to the rights and duties of the guardian of the person of the minor, and to residual parental rights and duties;

“Minor” means an individual who is under the age of majority;

“Parent” means either a natural or adoptive parent of the child, a person adjudged the parent of the child in judicial proceedings or a man presumed to be the father under W.S.

14-2-504

;

“Parties” include the child, his parents, guardian or custodian, the state of Wyoming and any other person made a party by an order to appear, or named by the juvenile court;

“Probation” means a legal status created by court order following an adjudication of in need of supervision, where a child is permitted to remain in his home subject to supervision by a city, county or state probation officer, the department of family services or other qualified private organization the court may designate. A child is subject to return to the court for violation of the terms or conditions of probation provided for in the court order;

“Protective supervision” means a legal status created by court order following an adjudication of neglect, whereby the child is permitted to remain in his home subject to supervision by the department of family services, a county or state probation officer or other qualified agency or individual the court may designate;

“Residual parental rights and duties” means those rights and duties remaining with the parents after custody, guardianship of the person or both have been vested in another person, agency or institution. Residual parental rights and duties include but are not limited to:

The duty to support and provide necessities of life;

The right to consent to adoption;

The right to reasonable visitation unless restricted or prohibited by court order;

The right to determine the minor’s religious affiliation; and

The right to petition on behalf of the minor.

“Shelter care” means the temporary care of a child in physically unrestricting facilities pending court disposition or execution of a court order for placement or commitment;

“Status offense” means an offense which, if committed by an adult, would not constitute an act punishable as a criminal offense by the laws of this state or a violation of a municipal ordinance, but does not include a violation of W.S. 12-6-101(b) or (c);

“This act” means W.S.

14-6-401

through

14-6-440

;

“Substance abuse assessment” means an evaluation conducted by a qualified person using practices and procedures approved by the department of health to determine whether a person has a need for alcohol or other drug treatment and the level of treatment services required to treat that person;

“Another planned permanent living arrangement” means a permanency plan for youth sixteen (16) years of age or older other than reunification, adoption, legal guardianship or placement with a fit and willing relative;

“Qualified individual” means a person who meets the requirements of 42 U.S.C. § 675a(c)(1)(D);

“Qualified residential treatment program” means a program that meets the requirements of 42 U.S.C. § 672(k)(4).

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 81, § 2; 2003, ch. 93, § 2; 2008, ch. 18, § 1; 2014 ch. 63, § 1, effective March 10, 2014; 2016 ch. 95, § 2, effective March 4, 2016; 2020 ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2022 ch. 4, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, inserted “provided for in the court order” in the second sentence of (a)(xvi).

The 2014 amendment,

in (a)(iv), substituted “eighteenth birthday” for “seventeenth birthday” in two places.

Laws 2014, ch. 63, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

The 2016 amendment

added (a)(xxiii).

Laws 2016, ch. 95, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8, Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 4, 2016.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (a)(xxiv) and (a)(xxv).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “as defined in W.S. 21-4-101(a)(ii)” in the first sentence of (a)(iv).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Quoted

in

In re NG, 14 P.3d 203,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 14-6-403.
Juvenile court authority over certain issues.

Coincident with proceedings concerning a minor alleged to be in need of supervision, the court has jurisdiction to:

Determine questions concerning the right to legal custody of the minor;

Order any party to the proceedings to perform any acts, duties and responsibilities the court deems necessary; or

Order any party to the proceedings to refrain from any act or conduct the court deems detrimental to the best interest and welfare of the minor or essential to the enforcement of any lawful order of disposition of the minor made by the court.

Nothing contained in this act is construed to deprive the district court of jurisdiction to determine questions of custody, parental rights, guardianship or any other questions involving minors, when the questions are the subject of or incidental to suits or actions commenced in or transferred to the district court as provided by law.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-402(a)(xxi).

Electronic monitoring services. —

The juvenile court had authority under subsection (a)(ii) to order the department of family services to pay for the electronic monitoring services provided by a private company for a minor child. In the Interest of NG, 14 P.3d 203,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 14-6-404.
Venue; change of venue or judge.

Proceedings under this act may be commenced in the county where the child is living or is present when the proceedings are commenced or in the county where the misconduct showing the child to be in need of supervision occurred. Change of venue or change of judge may be had under the circumstances and upon the terms and conditions provided by law in a civil action in the district court.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-6-405.
Taking of child into custody; when permitted.

A child may be taken into custody by a law enforcement officer without a warrant or court order when:

The circumstances would permit an arrest without a warrant under W.S.

7-2-102

;

There are reasonable grounds to believe the child has violated the terms of an order of the juvenile court issued pursuant to this act;

There are reasonable grounds to believe a child is abandoned, lost, suffering from illness or injury or seriously endangered by his surroundings and immediate custody appears to be necessary for his protection;

The child’s conduct or behavior seriously endangers himself and immediate custody appears necessary; or

There are reasonable grounds to believe the child has run away from his parents, guardian or custodian.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1; 2008, ch. 18, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, inserted “issued pursuant to this act” in (a)(ii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-6-406.
Child in custody; no detention or shelter care placement without court order; exceptions; notice to parent or guardian; release.

A child taken into custody shall not be placed in detention or shelter care without a court order unless shelter care is required to:

Protect the child’s person;

Prevent the child from being removed from the jurisdiction of the court; or

Provide the child having no parent, guardian, custodian or other responsible adult with supervision and care and return him to the court when required.

Any person taking a child into custody shall as soon as possible notify the child’s parent, guardian or custodian. Unless the child’s detention or shelter care is authorized by a court order issued pursuant to this act or required for one (1) of the reasons in subsection (a) of this section, the child shall be released to the care of his parent, guardian, custodian or other responsible adult upon that person’s written promise to present the child before the court upon request.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1; 2008, ch. 18, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “a court order issued pursuant to this act” for “court order” in (b).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-6-407.
Detention or shelter care; delivery of child pending hearing; placing children; notice if no court order.

If detention or shelter care of a child appears necessary to the person taking custody of the child, the child shall be delivered as soon as possible to the court or to the detention or shelter care facility designated by the court pending a hearing.

In providing detention or shelter care placement:

A child alleged to be in need of supervision shall be placed for detention or shelter care in the least restrictive environment reasonably available, which may be a foster home or other child care facility certified by the department of family services or approved by the court;

If facilities or services are not immediately available to house and protect the child, the judge may order the child held in a temporary holding area at the local law enforcement complex. No child in need of supervision shall be placed in a jail, but may be placed in a juvenile detention facility if the child has been adjudicated under article 2 of this chapter for having committed a delinquent act;

A child alleged to be in need of supervision shall, if necessary, be detained in a separate detention home or facility, provided the child shall not be detained in the Wyoming boys’ school or the Wyoming girls’ school.

The person in charge of any detention or shelter care facility shall promptly notify the court and the district attorney of any child being cared for at the facility without a court order and shall deliver the child to the court upon request.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1; 2008, ch. 18, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in (b)(ii), inserted “in a temporary holding area” in the first sentence, substituted “, but may be placed in a juvenile detention facility if the child has been adjudicated under article 2 of this chapter for having committed a delinquent act” for “other than for a delinquent act” in the second sentence.

§ 14-6-408.
Notice of detention or shelter care to be given district attorney; written statement required; duty of district attorney.

When a child is taken into custody without a court order and is placed in detention or shelter care, the person taking custody of the child shall notify the district attorney without delay. Also the person shall as soon as possible file a brief written statement with the district attorney setting forth the facts which led to taking the child into custody and the reason why the child was not released.

Upon receiving notice that a child is being held in detention or shelter care, the district attorney shall immediately review the need for detention or shelter care and may order the child released unless he determines detention or shelter care is necessary under the provisions of W.S. 14-6-406(a) or unless ordered by the court.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1.

§ 14-6-409.
Taking of child into custody; informal hearing where no court order; conditional release; evidence; rehearing.

When a child is placed in detention or shelter care without a court order, a petition as provided in W.S.

14-6-412

shall be promptly filed and presented to the court. An informal detention or shelter care hearing shall be held as soon as reasonably possible not later than forty-eight (48) hours, excluding weekends and legal holidays, after the child is taken into custody to determine if further detention or shelter care is required pending further court action. The child shall be interviewed by the department or its designee prior to the detention or shelter care hearing, but in no event later than twenty-four (24) hours, excluding weekends and legal holidays, after the child is taken into custody. The department or its designee shall submit a written report of the interview to the court, including an assessment of the immediate needs of the child and a recommendation for the most appropriate placement for the child pending court disposition or execution of a court order for placement or commitment. Written notice stating the time, place and purpose of the hearing shall be given to the child and to his parents, guardian or custodian.

At the commencement of the hearing the judge shall advise the child and his parents, guardian or custodian of:

The contents of the petition and the nature of the allegations contained therein;

Their right to counsel as provided in W.S.

14-6-422

;

The right to confront and cross-examine witnesses or to present witnesses or evidence in their own behalf and the right to issuance of process by the court to compel the appearance of witnesses and the production of evidence;

The right to a jury trial as provided in W.S.

14-6-423

; and

The right to appeal as provided in W.S.

14-6-432

.

The child shall be given an opportunity to admit or deny the allegations in the petition. If the allegations are admitted, the court shall make the appropriate adjudication and may proceed immediately to a disposition of the case, provided the court has the predisposition report and multidisciplinary recommendations, in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

14-6-429

, except that a commissioner acting in the absence or incapacity of the judge may take testimony to establish a factual basis and accept an admission and perform all other requirements of the initial hearing but shall not proceed to disposition. If denied, the court shall set a time not to exceed sixty (60) days for an adjudicatory hearing, unless the court finds good cause to delay or postpone the hearing. In no case shall the court hold the adjudicatory hearing more than ninety (90) days after the date the petition is filed.

Regardless of whether the allegations in the petition are admitted or denied, the court shall determine whether or not the child’s full-time detention or shelter care is required pending further proceedings. If the court finds that returning the child to the home is contrary to the welfare of the child, the court shall enter the finding on the record and order the child placed in the legal custody of the department of family services. The court shall explain the terms of the court order to the child, his parents or legal guardian and any other person the court deems necessary. If the court finds that full-time detention or shelter care is not required, the court shall order the child released and may impose one (1) or more of the following conditions:

Place the child in the custody and supervision of his parents, guardian or custodian, under the protective supervision of the department of family services or under the supervision of any individual or organization approved by the court that agrees to supervise the child;

Place restrictions on the child’s travel, associates, activities or place of abode during the period of his release, including a requirement that the child return to the physical custody of his parents, guardian or custodian at specified hours; or

Impose any other terms and conditions of release deemed reasonably necessary to assure the appearance of the child at subsequent proceedings or necessary to his protection from harm.

All relevant and material evidence helpful in determining the need for detention or shelter care may be admitted by the court even though not competent in an adjudicatory hearing on the allegations of the petition.

If a child is not released after a detention or shelter care hearing and it appears by sworn statement of the parents, guardian or custodian that they did not receive notice and did not waive notice and appearance at the hearing, the court shall rehear the matter without delay.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1; 2004, ch. 127, § 2; 2008, ch. 18, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a), substituted “forty-eight (48) hours” for “seventy-two (72) hours,” and inserted “excluding weekends and legal holidays” preceding “after the child is taken into custody”; in (b)(iii) inserted “or evidence” following “witnesses or to present witnesses,” and “and the right to issuance of process by the court to compel the appearance of witnesses and the production of evidence” at the end; rewrote (c), adding the proviso and exception in the second sentence, the limitation in the third sentence, and the fourth sentence; and in (d) inserted the second sentence, and in (d)(i) inserted “protective” preceding “supervision of the department of family.”

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, inserted the present third and fourth sentences in (a); and inserted the present third sentence in (d).

§ 14-6-410.
Hearing conducted by commissioner; authority and duty; review by court.

In the absence or incapacity of the judge, the detention or shelter care hearing may be conducted by a district court commissioner of the county in which the child is being held in detention or shelter care.

The commissioner may make any order concerning the child’s release, continued detention or shelter care as authorized to the judge under W.S.

14-6-409

. If the child is not released after the hearing, the commissioner shall promptly file with the court a complete written resume of the evidence adduced at the hearing and his reasons for not releasing the child. The commissioner shall conduct the hearing pursuant to W.S.

14-6-409

except that, if a child who has been advised of his rights wishes to admit the allegations, the commissioner may take testimony to establish a factual basis and accept the admission and perform all other requirements of the initial hearing but shall not proceed to disposition. The hearing shall be conducted in the presence of counsel and guardian ad litem, if so appointed. The commissioner may also appoint counsel, appoint a guardian ad litem, order a predisposition report, appoint a multidisciplinary team, issue subpoenas or search warrants, order physical or medical examinations and authorize emergency medical, surgical or dental treatment all as provided in this act. The commissioner shall not make final orders of adjudication or disposition.

The court shall review the reports, orders and actions of the commissioner as soon as reasonably possible and confirm or modify the commissioner’s orders and actions as it deems appropriate.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1; 2004, ch. 127, § 2.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (b), added the third and fourth sentences, and in the fifth sentence, inserted “appoint counsel, appoint a guardian ad litem, order a predisposition report, appoint a multidisciplinary team,” and substituted “this act” for “W.S.

14-6-417

through

14-6-420

.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-6-411.
Complaints alleging child in need of supervision; investigation and determination by district attorney.

Complaints alleging a child is in need of supervision shall be referred to the office of the district attorney. The district attorney shall determine whether the best interest of the child requires that judicial action be taken. The department of family services and the county sheriff shall provide the district attorney with any assistance he may require in making an investigation. The district attorney shall prepare and file a petition with the court if he believes action is necessary to protect the interest of the child.

In determining the action necessary to protect the interest of the public or the child with regard to a petition alleging a child in need of supervision, the prosecuting attorney shall consider the following:

Alternative community programs;

Mental health counseling services available to the family;

Family preservation services offered by the department of family services;

Enforcement of compulsory attendance requirements under W.S.

21-4-101

through

21-4-107

;

Municipal and circuit court remedies;

If the child has reached his sixteenth birthday, whether or not the child presents a clear and present danger to himself, his family or the community.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2022 ch. 4, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, rewrote (b)(iv), which read, “Use of truancy statute enforcement.”

§ 14-6-412.
Commencement of proceedings; contents of petition.

Proceedings in juvenile court are commenced by filing a petition with the clerk of the court. The petition and all subsequent pleadings, motions, orders and decrees shall be entitled “State of Wyoming, In the Interest of . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . , minor.” A petition shall be signed by the district attorney on information and belief of the alleged facts. All petitions must be verified.

The petition shall set forth all jurisdictional facts, including but not limited to all of the following:

The child’s name, date of birth and address;

The names and addresses of the child’s parents, guardian or custodian and the child’s spouse, if any;

Whether the child is being held in detention or shelter care and if so, the name and address of the facility and the time shelter care commenced;

A statement setting forth with particularity the facts which bring the child within the provisions of this act;

Whether the child is an Indian child as defined in the federal Indian Child Welfare Act and, if so, a statement setting forth with particularity the notice provided to the appropriate tribal court.

The petition shall state if any of the facts enumerated in subsection (b) of this section are unknown.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1; 2004, ch. 127, § 2; 2011, ch. 176, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added (b)(v).

The 2011 amendment,

in the introductory language of (b), added “all of the following”; and in (b)(iii), deleted “and” at the end.

Laws 2011, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

Editor's notes. —

The Indian Child Welfare Act, referred to in subdivision (b)(v) of this section, is found at 25 USCS § 1901 et seq.

Laws 2009, ch. 70, § 2, effective July 1, 2009, provides that: “The provisions of W.S. 14-3-427(e) and (f), 14-3-429(d), 14-6-227(e) and (f) and 14-6-427(e) and (f) as amended by section 1 of this act, shall apply to child protection cases in which a petition was filed under W.S.

14-3-412

,

14-6-212

or

14-6-412

on or after July 1, 2009.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-6-413.
Order to appear; contents thereof; when child taken into immediate custody; waiver of service.

After a petition is filed, the court shall issue an order to appear. The order shall:

State the name of the court, the title of the proceedings and the time and place for the initial hearing;

Direct the persons named therein to appear personally at the hearing and direct the person having actual physical custody or control of the child to present the child before the court at the hearing;

Be directed to the child, the child’s parents, guardian, custodian and the child’s spouse, if any, and to any other person the court deems necessary.

If it appears to the court by affidavit by the district attorney based on actual knowledge or on information and belief that the conduct, condition or surroundings of the child seriously endanger the child’s health or welfare, that the child may abscond or be removed from the jurisdiction of the court or that the child will not be brought before the court notwithstanding service of the order, the court may direct in the order to appear that the person serving the order take the child into immediate custody and bring him before the court.

Service of the order may be waived either in writing or by voluntary appearance at the hearing, provided a child may waive service of the order only with the consent of his parents, guardian, custodian, guardian ad litem or counsel.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1.

§ 14-6-414.
Service of process; order of custody.

In proceedings under this act, service of order to appear or other process within the state shall be made by the sheriff of the county where service is made, by his undersheriff or deputy or by any law enforcement officer or responsible adult not a party to the proceeding and appointed by the clerk.

Within the state, service of order to appear is made by personally delivering a copy of the order together with a copy of the petition to the person ordered to appear, provided that parents of a child may both be served by personally delivering to either parent two (2) copies of the order and petition, one (1) copy for each parent. A child under the age of fourteen (14) years is served by delivering a copy of the order together with a copy of the petition to the child’s parents, guardian, custodian or other adult having the actual physical custody and control of the child or to a guardian ad litem or attorney appointed for the child.

If it appears to the court by affidavit that the parents, guardian or custodian of the child cannot be found within the state, the court may order personal service outside the state or service by certified mail with return receipt requested signed by addressee only. If the address of the child’s parents, guardian or custodian is unknown and cannot with reasonable diligence be ascertained, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the child and to receive service of process.

Service by certified mail is complete on the date the clerk receives the return receipt signed by addressee. Personal service either within or outside the state is complete on the date when copies of the order to appear and petition are delivered to the person to be served.

When personal service of order to appear is made within the state, service shall be completed not less than two (2) days before the hearing and when made outside the state, service shall be completed not less than five (5) days before the hearing. However, notwithstanding any provision within this act, the court may order that a child be taken into custody as provided in W.S.

14-6-413

or that a child be held in detention or shelter care pending further proceedings as provided in W.S.

14-6-409

, even though service of order to appear on the parents, guardian or custodian of the child is not complete at the time of making the order.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1; 2004, ch. 127, § 2.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (e), twice substituted “shall be completed” for “must be completed.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-6-415.
Presence of parent, custodian or guardian at hearing; failure to appear; avoidance of service; issuance of bench warrant.

The court shall insure the presence at any hearing of the parents, guardian or custodian of any child subject to the proceedings under this act.

Any person served with an order to appear as provided in W.S.

14-6-414

and without reasonable cause fails to appear, is liable for contempt of court and the court may issue a bench warrant to cause the person to be brought before the court.

If the child, his parents, guardian or custodian or any other person willfully avoids or refuses service of order to appear, or it appears to the court that service of the order will be ineffectual or that the welfare of the child requires that he be brought immediately into the custody of the court, a bench warrant may be issued by the court for the child or his parents, guardian, custodian or any person having the actual physical custody or control of the child.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-6-416.
Appointment of guardian ad litem.

The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for a child who is a party to proceedings under this act if the child has no parent, guardian or custodian appearing in his behalf or if the interests of the parents, guardian or custodian are adverse to the best interest of the child. A party to the proceeding or employee or representative thereof shall not be appointed guardian ad litem for the child.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-402(a)(xxi).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Attorney for Child Versus Guardian Ad Litem: Wyoming Creates a Hybrid, but is it a Formula for Malpractice?,” see XXXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 381 (1999).

§ 14-6-417.
Subpoenas for witnesses and evidence.

Upon application of any party to the proceeding, the clerk shall issue and the court on its own motion may issue subpoenas requiring the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of records, documents or other tangible evidence at any hearing.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1.

§ 14-6-418.
Search warrant; when authorized; affidavit required; contents of affidavit and warrant; service and return.

The court or a commissioner may issue a search warrant within the court’s jurisdiction if it appears by application supported by affidavit of one (1) or more adults that a child is in need of supervision and the child is in hiding to avoid service of process or being taken into custody.

The affidavit shall be in writing, signed and affirmed by the affiant. The affidavit shall set forth:

The name and age of the child sought, provided that if the name or age of the child is unknown the affidavit shall set forth a description of the child sufficient to identify him with reasonable certainty and a statement that the affiant believes the child is of age to come within the provisions of this act; and

The affiant’s belief that the child sought is in need of supervision and is in hiding to avoid service of process or being taken into custody, and a statement of the facts upon which the belief is based.

The warrant may be directed to any law enforcement officer of the county or municipality in which the place or premises to be searched is located. The warrant shall:

Name or describe the child sought;

Name the address or location and describe the place or premises to be searched;

State the grounds for issuance of the warrant;

Name the person or persons whose affidavit has been taken in support of the warrant; and

Authorize the officer to whom the warrant is directed to conduct the search and instruct him as to the disposition of the child if found, pending further proceedings by the court.

The officer making the search may enter the place or premises described in the warrant at any time with force if necessary, in order to remove the child. The officer conducting the search shall serve a copy of the warrant upon the person in possession of the place or premises searched and shall return the original warrant to the court showing his actions in the premises.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-402(a)(xxi).